Hawaii, session 2025, SB1625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Hawaii board of professional engineers, architects, surveyors, and landscape architects (board) previously voted in favor of adopting a uniform standard for landscape architecture licensure developed in 2022 by the Council of Landscape Architectural Registration Boards (CLARB), of which the board is a member.  CLARB is a nonprofit organization that works to protect the public's health, safety, and welfare by establishing and promoting professional licensure standards for landscape architects.  Its members are the licensure boards across the United States and Canada. The legislature further finds that adopting uniform standards for licensure would give the board the ability to reduce the years of experience required for most applicants seeking licensure while continuing to ensure the protection of the public and environment throughout the State. Additionally, the Hawaii chapter of the American Society of Landscape Architects supports adoption of these uniform standards. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to adopt uniform standards for licensing requirements for the profession of landscape architecture to create consistent requirements across jurisdictions, improve mobility for landscape architects, and provide increased access to the profession. SECTION 2.  Section 464-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows: "(d)  No person shall be eligible for licensure as a professional landscape architect unless: [(1)  The person is the holder of an unexpired license issued to the person by any jurisdiction, domestic or foreign, in which the requirements for licensure at the time the person was first licensed are of a standard satisfactory to the board; provided that if the board is in doubt as to whether the standards are satisfactory, or as to whether the holder was required to fully comply with them, it shall require that the holder successfully pass the national landscape architect licensing examination and a written examination, prescribed by the board designed to test the holder's knowledge of the State's climatic conditions, native plants and native ecosystems, land use ordinance and special management area requirements, and cultural and historical conditions affecting landscape architecture; (2)  The person is the holder of a master's degree in landscape architecture from an institution of higher education approved by the board; is a graduate of a school or college approved by the board as of satisfactory standing and has completed a landscape architectural curriculum of four years or more; has had two years of full-time lawful experience in landscape architecture work of a character satisfactory to the board, or part-time experience which the board finds to be the equivalent thereof; and has successfully passed the national landscape architect licensing examination and a written examination, prescribed by the board designed to test the person's knowledge of the State's climatic conditions, native plants and native ecosystems, land use ordinance and special management area requirements, and cultural and historical conditions affecting landscape architecture; (3)  The person is a graduate of a school or college approved by the board as of satisfactory standing, and has completed a landscape architectural curriculum of four years or more; has had three years of full-time lawful experience in landscape architecture work of a character satisfactory to the board, or part-time experience which the board finds to be the equivalent thereof; and has successfully passed the national landscape architect licensing examination and a written examination, prescribed by the board designed to test the person's knowledge of the State's climatic conditions, native plants and native ecosystems, land use ordinance and special management area requirements, and cultural and historical conditions affecting landscape architecture; (4)  The person is a graduate of a school or college approved by the board as of satisfactory standing, and has completed a pre-landscape architecture or arts and science curriculum of four years or more; has had five years of full-time lawful experience in landscape architecture work of a character satisfactory to the board, or part-time experience which the board finds to be the equivalent thereof; and has successfully passed the national landscape architect licensing examination and a written examination, prescribed by the board designed to test the person's knowledge of the State's climatic conditions, native plants and native ecosystems, land use ordinance and special management area requirements, and cultural and historical conditions affecting landscape architecture; or (5)  The person has had twelve years of full-time lawful experience in landscape architecture work of a character satisfactory to the board, or part-time experience which the board finds to be the equivalent thereof; and has successfully passed the national landscape architect licensing examination and a written examination, prescribed by the board designed to test the person's knowledge of the State's climatic conditions, native plants and native ecosystems, land use ordinance and special management area requirements, and cultural and historical conditions affecting landscape architecture. (6)] (1)  The person satisfies the requirements for licensure by endorsement prescribed by the board; or (2)  The person is the holder of a degree in landscape architecture from a school or college approved by the board and has satisfied the examination and lawful experience requirements prescribed by the board. The applicant shall also certify on the application that the applicant has read, understood, and agrees to comply with the laws and rules that the board determines are required for licensure. In addition to the foregoing requirements, the board, in its discretion, may also require additional proof that the applicant is competent to practice professionally, and whenever the board is not fully satisfied from the results of an examination that any applicant is competent to practice professionally, it may give the applicant a further examination or examinations. No person shall be eligible for licensure as a professional engineer, architect, land surveyor, or landscape architect if the person does not possess a history of honesty, truthfulness, financial integrity, and fair dealing." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________